Utah statutes.
58-80a-305.   Fees -- Rulemaking authority.

(1)  The division may charge a fee, established under Section 63J-1-504, to recover the costs of:

(a)  administering the examination described in Section 58-80a-303; and

(b)  issuing the certificate described in Subsection 58-80a-301(1).

(2)  The division may make rules, pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to accomplish the requirements of this chapter.

